Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1351.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1529. C ulturally Relevant and Sustaining Education Prohibited.--(a) Culturally relevant and sustaining education may not be integrated into education preparation, induction and continuing professional development programs.(b) The regulations at 22 Pa. Code §§ 49.1 (relating to definitions), 49.13 (relating to policies), 49.14 (relating to approval of institutions and alternative program providers), 123456789101112131415161718192021 49.16 (relating to approval of induction plans) and 49.17 (relating to continuing professional education) are abrogated insofar as they relate to culturally relevant and sustaining education.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1351PN1539 - 2 - 12345